Illinois, session 104th, HB3919.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The amount of $2,964,500, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Office of the Lieutenant Governor to meet its 8operational expenses for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 92025. 10    Section 10. The sum of $47,500, or so much thereof as may 11be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to 12the Office of the Lieutenant Governor for all costs associated 13with Rural Affairs including any grants or administrative 14expenses. 15    Section 15. The sum of $100,000, or so much thereof as may 16be necessary, is appropriated to the Office of the Lieutenant 17Governor from the Lieutenant Governor's Grant Fund for 18ordinary and contingent expenses associated with the office. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 202025.